Utah statutes.
41-6a-508.   Arrest without a warrant for a driving under the influence violation.

A peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest a person for a violation of Section 41-6a-502 when the peace officer has probable cause to believe the violation has occurred, although not in the peace officer's presence, and if the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the violation was committed by the person.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

